uz.aff
SFX Z 0 ysizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ysizlarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydilarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ymanku . 
SFX Z 0 ymizku . 
SFX Z 0 ysanku . 
SFX Z 0 ysizku . 
SFX Z 0 ysizlarku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiku . 
SFX Z 0 ydilarku . 
SFX Z 0 may . 
SFX Z 0 mayman . 
SFX Z 0 maymiz . 
SFX Z 0 maysan . 
SFX Z 0 maysiz . 
SFX Z 0 maysizlar . 
SFX Z 0 maydi . 
SFX Z 0 maydilar . 
SFX Z 0 maymanmi . 
SFX Z 0 maymizmi . 
SFX Z 0 maysanmi . 
SFX Z 0 maysizmi . 
SFX Z 0 maysizlarmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydimi . 
SFX Z 0 maydilarmi . 
SFX Z 0 maymanda . 
SFX Z 0 maymizda . 
SFX Z 0 maysanda . 
SFX Z 0 maysizda . 
SFX Z 0 maysizlarda . 
SFX Z 0 maydida . 
SFX Z 0 maydilarda . 
SFX Z 0 maymanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maymizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maysanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maysizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maysizlarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydimikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydilarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maymanku . 
SFX Z 0 maymizku . 
SFX Z 0 maysanku . 
SFX Z 0 maysizku . 
SFX Z 0 maysizlarku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiku . 
SFX Z 0 maydilarku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganim . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganing . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingku . 
SFX Z 0 ydigani . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganidir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganida . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganiku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimiz . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimizmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimizdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimizda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimizku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingiz . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingizmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingizdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingizda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganingizku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarim . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaring . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlari . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaridir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarida . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaridirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlariku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimiz . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimizmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimizdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimizda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarimizku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringiz . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringizmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringizdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringizda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlaringizku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganim . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganing . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingku . 
SFX Z 0 maydigani . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganidir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganida . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganidirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganiku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimiz . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimizmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimizdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimizda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganimizku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingiz . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingizmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingizdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingizda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganingizku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarim . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaring . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlari . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaridir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarida . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaridirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlariku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimiz . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimizmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimizdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimizda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarimizku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringiz . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringizmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringizdir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringizda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlaringizku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganni . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganning . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganga . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarni . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarning . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarga . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganni . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganning . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganga . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarni . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarning . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarga . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarda . 
SFX Z 0 ydigannimi . 
SFX Z 0 ydigannidir . 
SFX Z 0 ydigannida . 
SFX Z 0 ydigannidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydigannimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganniku . 
SFX Z 0 ydigangami . 
SFX Z 0 ydigangadir . 
SFX Z 0 ydigangada . 
SFX Z 0 ydigangadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydigangamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydigangaku . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandandir . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandanda . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandanku . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandami . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandadir . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandada . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydigandaku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarnimi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarnidir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarnida . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlarniku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlargami . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlargadir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlargada . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlargadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlargamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlargaku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardanmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardandir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardanda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardandirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardanku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardami . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardadir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardada . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardadirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardamikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganlardaku . 
SFX Z 0 maydigannimi . 
SFX Z 0 maydigannidir . 
SFX Z 0 maydigannida . 
SFX Z 0 maydigannidirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydigannimikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganniku . 
SFX Z 0 maydigangami . 
SFX Z 0 maydigangadir . 
SFX Z 0 maydigangada . 
SFX Z 0 maydigangadirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydigangamikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydigangaku . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandanmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandandir . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandanda . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandandirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandanku . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandami . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandadir . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandada . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandadirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandamikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydigandaku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarnimi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarnidir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarnida . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlarniku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlargami . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlargadir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlargada . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlargadirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlargamikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlargaku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardanmi . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardandir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardanda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardandirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardanku . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardami . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardadir . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardada . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardadirda . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardamikan . 
SFX Z 0 maydiganlardaku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimni . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimnimi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimnidir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimnida . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimniku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimning . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimningmi . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimningdir . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimningda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimningdirda . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimningmikan . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimningku . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimga . 
SFX Z 0 ydiganimgami . 
