uz.dic
abstraktla/Z
avansla/Z
avra/Z
ajabsinqira/Z
azotla/Z
ayirboshla/Z
ayrimla/Z
alangla/Z
alahla/Z
alebastrla/Z
alifla/Z
alpong-talpongla/Z
angilla/Z
andazala/Z
anqi/Z
arazla/Z
ari/Z
arrala/Z
aslahala/Z
atai/Z
atirla/Z
afshonla/Z
achomla/Z
babala/Z
badoyela/Z
balqi/Z
baravarla/Z
barobarla/Z
baxyala/Z
bachkila/Z
bezakla/Z
bezilla/Z
bekla/Z
bella/Z
betla/Z
besha/Z
big’irla/Z
bijg’i/Z
bizilla/Z
biqirla/Z
biliqsi/Z
bilqi/Z
bintla/Z
bobla/Z
bodirla/Z
boyi/Z
bong’illa/Z
botinqira/Z
boshla/Z
bo’vakla/Z
bo’g’imla/Z
bo’yoqla/Z
buydala/Z
bukla/Z
bo’la/Z
buldozerla/Z
bo’pinturuqla/Z
burgala/Z
burqi/Z
bo’rla/Z
bo’rsi/Z
bo’tamla/Z
butqala/Z
bo’sha/Z
vavaqla/Z
vag’irla/Z
vadirla/Z
vazelinla/Z
vaysa/Z
vaqirla/Z
valdira/Z
vang’illa/Z
varangla/Z
varqira/Z
vaxla/Z
vashilla/Z
veyalkala/Z
vig’irla/Z
vizvizla/Z
vilkala/Z
visilla/Z
vishilla/Z
voyvoyla/Z
voqilla/Z
votvotla/Z
gazla/Z
galala/Z
gangi/Z
gahgahla/Z
gijgijla/Z
gildira/Z
gruzinchala/Z
guvohla/Z
gulla/Z
go’ngla/Z
go’niyala/Z
gurzila/Z
gurulla/Z
gutgutla/Z
daydi/Z
dalilla/Z
dandanala/Z
darrala/Z
dezinfeksiyala/Z
de/Z
defoliatsiyala/Z
dikirla/Z
dimla/Z
dirnngla/Z
dovla/Z
donala/Z
duvarakla/Z
duda/Z
dudla/Z
dukkakla/Z
do’qirla/Z
do’mbilla/Z
do’pilla/Z
do’rilla/Z
dutdutla/Z
yeg’ovla/Z
yoyilinqira/Z
yoqala/Z
yolg’izla/Z
yolla/Z
yemaksira/Z
yonboshla/Z
yoppala/Z
yerparchinla/Z
yotoqla/Z
javdira/Z
jag’illa/Z
jazola/Z
jankilla/Z
jafola/Z
jizilla/Z
jildla/Z
jilpangla/Z
jing’irla/Z
jiringla/Z
jihozla/Z
juvala/Z
jo’jala/Z
jo’rilla/Z
jo’yakla/Z
zapasla/Z
zarla/Z
zehla/Z
zinkira/Z
ziravorla/Z
zirqira/Z
zontla/Z
zorla/Z
zo’gatala/Z
ivirsila/Z
ignala/Z
izilla/Z
yig’la/Z
yig’lamsira/Z
yiltilla/Z
ilangla/Z
ilg’a/Z
iljira/Z
imilla/Z
i/Z
ingichkala/Z
inji/Z
integralla/Z
irg’ishla/Z
irkilla/Z
iskala/Z
ysmla/Z
ista/Z
yo’lboshla/Z
yo’rmala/Z
ixchamla/Z
ihra/Z
ishqa/Z
ishonqira/Z
kavla/Z
kakirla/Z
kallakla/Z
kami/Z
karnizla/Z
kvartalla/Z
ketmonla/Z
kiftla/Z
knopkala/Z
kooperatsiyala/Z
kraxmalla/Z
ko’karinqira/Z
kultivatsiyala/Z
kura/Z
kurtakla/Z
qabarchi/Z
qag’illa/Z
qaytaqila/Z
qalayla/Z
qamra/Z
qapchimoq-qa/Z
qarsnlla/Z
qatlamla/Z
qahqahla/Z
qizarinqira/Z
qiynoqla/Z
qilpangla/Z
qirg’oqla/Z
qirtilla/Z
qisirla/Z
qichirla/Z
quvla/Z
qo’lansi/Z
qo’noqla/Z
qo’ri/Z
quruqsa/Z
quchoqla/Z
laqilla/Z
livitla/Z
lipilla/Z
litrla/Z
lokla/Z
lo’qilla/Z
mazaxla/Z
ma’yuslai/Z
mijg’i/Z
miljingla/Z
misqolla/Z
molala/Z
mukofotla/Z
mo’ltilla/Z
mustahkamla/Z
nayla/Z
napaqayla/Z
nashatirla/Z
nikella/Z
nishla/Z
normala/Z
obdira/Z
ovovla/Z
oqarnnqira/Z
omixtala/Z
orqala/Z
ohhola/Z
paypasla/Z
panala/Z
pardala/Z
parchala/Z
peshkashla/Z
piltakachla/Z
pichoqla/Z
plombala/Z
polla/Z
porala/Z
proyektla/Z
po’ng’irla/Z
pufpufla/Z
ranji/Z
rekonstruksiyala/Z
ro’pochla/Z
sayra/Z
salmoqlanib-salmoqla/Z
saralashmoq-sara/Z
sarfla/Z
selitrala/Z
sepsi/Z
sizsira/Z
silosla/Z
sirachla/Z
sistemala/Z
sozla/Z
soyala/Z
so’voqla/Z
suyib-siypala/Z
sumakla/Z
surka/Z
suyamla/Z
tayyorla/Z
takrorla/Z
taqilla/Z
talqinla/Z
tamomla/Z
tani/Z
tarangla/Z
tasdiqla/Z
tati/Z
taxtakachla/Z
tashla/Z
tevarakla/Z
tekisla/Z
tepchi/Z
tig’izla/Z
tiqilla/Z
tilla/Z
tindala/Z
tipirchila/Z
tirka/Z
tisla/Z
tishqolila/Z
tojikila/Z
topirla/Z
toti/Z
to’g’onla/Z
to’zi/Z
to’qi/Z
to’liqla/Z
to’na/Z
to’pla/Z
to’rla/Z
tutamla/Z
tufla/Z
uvala/Z
o’g’itla/Z
uzoqla/Z
o’yna/Z
o’qaloqla/Z
ulgurjila/Z
unifikatsyyala/Z
o’rla/Z
o’rokla/Z
o’smoqsi/Z
o’tla/Z
uhuhla/Z
uchla/Z
uyala/Z
fikrla/Z
xanjarla/Z
xaxala/Z
xipchinla/Z
xixila/Z
xolla/Z
xomsira/Z
xromla/Z
xo’rla/Z
xo’shxo’shla/Z
chag’chag’la/Z
chaqilla/Z
chalqi/Z
changi/Z
chapi/Z
charmla/Z
chahchahla/Z
chelakla/Z
chig’irla/Z
chiziqla/Z
chikilla/Z
chilpilla/Z
chimtila/Z
chingla/Z
chirkayla/Z
chirsilla/Z
chog’la/Z
chorla/Z
chuvurla/Z
cho’kkala/Z
chulg’a/Z
churqilla/Z
chuhchuhla/Z
shabadala/Z
shaqirla/Z
shang’i/Z
sharhla/Z
shibbala/Z
shig’irla/Z
shilvira/Z
shiltala/Z
shipirla/Z
shirqira/Z
shlilkala/Z
shovurla/Z
shuvilla/Z
sho’rala/Z
eyovla/Z
eyra/Z
eqorila/Z
elansi/Z
elqila/Z
elovla/Z
elchi/Z
emda/Z
eri/Z
esankira/Z
ehtiyotla/Z
yumsha/Z
yaproqla/Z
yarqilla/Z
yaxlitla/Z
